apertium-kaa.kaa.lexc
LEXICON V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<neg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

! Participles
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{I%}p CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{o%}%{I%}п CLIT-GHANA-ETC ; ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<prc_perf%>:%{M%}%{A%}%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<prc_vol%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} VOL-ENDINGS ;
%<prc_fplan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<prc_fplan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%}sh%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;           ! Dir/LR
%<prc_plan%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}l%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_perf%>:%>%{I%}p CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<neg%>%<gna_perf%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%{E%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<gna_until%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}nsh%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<gna_after%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}л%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

! Verbal Adjectives
%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{A%}r V-ADJ ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>s V-ADJ ;

%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{A%}r%>l%{I%}k # ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>sl%{I%}%{K%} # ;

! Gerunds
%<ger_fut%>:%>%{A%}r GER-POSSESSIVES ;
%<neg%>%<ger_fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>s GER-POSSESSIVES ;

%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}r%>l%{I%}k GER-POSSESSIVES ;
%<neg%>%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>sl%{I%}%{K%} GER-POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON V-COMMON

V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

V-NONFINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ; 

LEXICON V-DER

%<coop%>:%>%{I%}s V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-TV-NOPASS

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ;

LEXICON V-TV-PASS

! e.g. ko'rin
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: V-COMMON ;

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX-IMPF

%<vaux%>%<pres%>: V-PERS-S1 ; ! /júr, jatir, tur, otir/
%<vaux%>%<neg%>%<pres%>:%{G%}%{A%}n% joq V-PERS-S1 ;
%<vaux%>: V-COMMON ;
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     auxiliary verbs

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX-IMPF-NEG

%<vaux%>%<neg%>%<pres%>: V-PERS-S1 ; !USE MT /жaтқaн жoқ/

LEXICON Vinfl-AUX

%<vaux%>: V-COMMON ; ! these four verbs in other tenses and all other aux. verbs

LEXICON Copula

e%<cop%>%<ger_past%>:eken GER-POSSESSIVES ;
e%<cop%>%<ger_perf%>:eken%>l%{I%}k GER-POSSESSIVES ;

e%<cop%>%<neg%>:emes V-PERS-S1 ;
e%<cop%>%<past%>:eken V-PERS-S1 ;
e%<cop%>%<neg%>%<past%>:emes% eken V-PERS-S1 ;
e%<cop%>%<ifi%>:e%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     PRONOUN'S INFLECTION

!!!!!!!   P E R S O N A L

LEXICON PRON-12SG-CASES

%<gen%>:eniń CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:aǵan CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:eni CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:enen CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:ende CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ins%>:en% menen CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<px%>:eniki%{n%} CASES ;
%<loc%>:endegi ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:endey CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<advl%>:enińshe CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-INFL

CASES-ETC ;
 
LEXICON PersonalPronouns
 
men%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:men COMMON-CLITICS ;
men%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:m PRON-12SG-CASES ;

sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:sen COMMON-CLITICS ;
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:s PRON-12SG-CASES ;

ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ol COMMON-CLITICS ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:o COMMON-CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:onıń COMMON-CLITICS ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:oǵan COMMON-CLITICS ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:onı COMMON-CLITICS ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:odan COMMON-CLITICS ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:onda COMMON-CLITICS ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ol% menen COMMON-CLITICS ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<px%>:oniki%{n%} CASES ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ondaǵı ATTR-SUBST ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<sim%>:onday COMMON-CLITICS ;
ol%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<advl%>:onıńsha COMMON-CLITICS ;

biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:biz PRON-PERS-INFL ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:bizler PRON-PERS-INFL ; ! Dir/LR ! FIXME
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:biziń COMMON-CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR ! FIXME not sure
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<advl%>:bizińshe COMMON-CLITICS ;

sizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:sizler PRON-PERS-INFL ;
sizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<advl%>:sizlershe COMMON-CLITICS ;

olar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:olar PRON-PERS-INFL ;
olaр%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<advl%>:oлaршa COMMON-CLITICS ;

siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>:siz PRON-PERS-INFL ;
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>%<advl%>:sizińshe COMMON-CLITICS ;
sizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:sizler PRON-PERS-INFL ;
sizler%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>%<advl%>:sizlershe COMMON-CLITICS ;

!!!!!!!   D E M O N S T R A T I V E

! FIXME CHECK (CLITICS-INCL-COP vs CLIT) I can't imagine forms like "бумын, бусың" etc.
! in Tatar, but not sure how it works in Kazakh /I.S./
!-----
! Good idea is to link prn.dem.sim forms alternatively to CLIT and CASE,
! so that it's "adverbial reading" (e.g. "шундый каты кычкырды") doesn't
! receive <nom> tag /IS/

LEXICON PRON-DEM-INFL

%<gen%>:nıń CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:ǵan CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:nı CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:dan CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<abl%>:nan CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR FIXME actually only "oсы" seems to take this.
%<abl%>:nnan CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR FIXME
%<loc%>:nda CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<px%>:niki%{n%} CASES ;
%<loc%>:ndaǵı ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:nday CASES ;  ! FIXME: should have <det>, etc.
%<advl%>:lay CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<qnt%>:nsha CLITICS-NO-COP ;         !

%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r CASES-ETC ;
%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:%>l%{A%}r%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;

! Commented out till these forms get implemented in tat.lexc too
!%<TD%>:шалық CLITICS-NO-COP ;        ! "that much"  ! FIXME: check cont lex
!%<reas%>%<abl%>:ндықтан # ; ! "because of"  ! FIXME: not attested with oсы?

! FIXME: 1) link the below to PRON-DEM-INFL if possible
!            (later, once we are certain about things)

LEXICON PRON-DEM-BUL

! FIXME CHECK (бұны vs мұны) Grammars I have list only forms with "б", but variants
! starting with "м" seem to be more frequent in the (wikipedia) corpus /I.S./
!-----
! <s>FIXME</s> (бұл%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:бұлар FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;) FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION might lead to
! overgeneration with p1,p2 possessives (they seem to take onle <px3sp> ending);
! on the other hand, with something like бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:мoнысы%{n%} CASES ;
! we loose things like бу<prn><dem><pl><px>:бoларныкы /I.S./

bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:bul CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:bu CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR
bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:bunıń CLITICS-NO-COP ;
! bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:мұның CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:buǵan CLITICS-NO-COP ;
bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:bunı CLITICS-NO-COP ;
! bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:мұны CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:budan CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:bunnan CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR
bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:bunda CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
! bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мұнда CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR
bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:bul% menen CLITICS-NO-COP ;
! bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:мұнымeн CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR
! bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px%>:мұнікі%{n%} CASES ; ! FIXME: check "м" vs "б"
bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:bundaǵı ATTR-SUBST ;
! bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мұндағы ATTR-SUBST ; ! Dir/LR
! bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:мұндай CASES ;
!bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:bunday CASES ; ! Dir/LR 
bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:bunday CASES ; ! FIXME: I removed DirLR to generate from Kazakh -FMT
! bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>%<px3sp%>:мұндай%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;
! bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>%<pl%>:мұндайлар CASES ;
! bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:мұндайлары%{n%} CASES ;
bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<advl%>:bılay CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<advl%>:bulay CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR
! bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:мұнша CLITICS-NO-COP ;
bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:bunısı%{n%} CASES ;


bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:bular CASES-ETC ;
bul%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:buları%{n%} CASES ;

 LEXICON Verbs
qabılla:qabılla V-TV-NOPASS ; ! ""
qabılla:qabıllan V-TV-PASS ; ! ""
de:de V-TV-NOPASS ; ! "speak"
de:delin V-TV-PASS ; ! "speak"
kór:kór V-TV-NOPASS ; ! "see"
kór:kórin V-TV-PASS ; ! "be seen"
al:al Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
pit:pit Vinfl-AUX ; !
júr:júr Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
ket:ket Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
otır:otır Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
tur:tur Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
shıq:shıq Vinfl-AUX ; !
jat:jatır Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! Dir/LR
jat:atır Vinfl-AUX-IMPF ; ! 
tur:tur Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
otır:otır Vinfl-AUX ; ! 
